Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.085

Certification—Cardiovascular invasive specialists.

(1) Until July 1, 2012, the secretary shall, in addition to certificates issued under RCW 18.84.080, issue a cardiovascular invasive specialist certificate to any person who:

(a) Has held a health care credential in good standing issued by the department for at least five years; and

(b) Has at least five years, with at least one thousand hours per year, of prior experience in cardiac or vascular catheterization during the period of time the person held the health care credential under (a) of this subsection.

(2) A person certified as a cardiovascular invasive specialist under this section is subject to the same renewal requirements as all other certified cardiovascular invasive specialists, but shall not be subject to the education and examination requirements, unless he or she allows his or her certification to expire without renewal for more than one year. If the person allows his or her certification to expire without renewal for more than one year, he or she must meet the same education and examination requirements as all other certified cardiovascular invasive specialists before being issued a new certification.

[ 2010 c 92 s 3.]

NOTES:

Interpretation—2010 c 92: See note following RCW 18.84.080.